Massachusetts, session 194th, S1263.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 272 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is hereby
amended by inserting after section 77C the following section 77D:-
(a) A person who by willful, wanton, reckless, or negligent act causes the unnecessary or
unjustified death of a cat or dog shall be liable in damages for the fair monetary value of the
deceased animal to the owner of the animal, including, but not limited to, damages for the loss of
comfort, protection, companionship, other special damages, services of the deceased animal to its
owner; reasonable afterlife expenses of the deceased animal; court costs and attorney's fees; and
other reasonable damages resulting from the willful, wanton, reckless, or negligent act. Non-
economic damages shall have a cap value of $30,000.00
of 2

(b) Damages under this section for unnecessary or unjustified death sustained by an
animal shall be recovered in an action of tort by the aggrieved, commenced within three years
from the date, of death or from the date when the aggrieved knew, or in the exercise of
reasonable diligence, should have known, of the factual basis for a claim of relief
of 2